Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.115, is amended to read: 97B.115 COMPUTER-ASSISTED REMOTE HUNTING deleted text begin PROHIBITEDdeleted text end . (a) No person shall operate, provide, sell, use or offer to operate, provide, sell or use any computer software or service that allows a person, not physically present at the site, to remotely control a weapon that could be used to take any wild animal by remote operation, including, but not limited to, weapons or devices set up to fire through the use of the Internet or through a remote control device. (b) A person who violates deleted text begin this sectiondeleted text end new text begin paragraph (a)new text end is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text begin (c) Effective January 1, 2027, a person who possesses a remote pilot certificate issued by the Federal Aviation Administration may use a small unmanned aircraft system, as defined under section 360.013, to locate deceased big game for retrieval. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin RECOMMENDATIONS FOR USE OF UNMANNED AIRCRAFT TO LOCATE DECEASED BIG GAME.new text end new text begin By January 1, 2026, the commissioner of natural resources, in conjunction with interested stakeholders, must make findings and recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment policy on statutory and policy changes needed to facilitate the use of small unmanned aircraft systems to locate deceased big game for retrieval. The findings and recommendations must include recommendations for: new text end new text begin (1) licensure requirements, including requirements for maintaining insurance; new text end new text begin (2) requirements applicable to unmanned aircraft and related equipment; new text end new text begin (3) whether an annual fee will be necessary to administer Minnesota Statutes, section 97B.115, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (4) guaranteeing respect for affected owners' property; and new text end new text begin (5) any other matters the commissioner deems relevant. new text end